Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-12] Effect of currency
revalorizations. (a) If, after an obligation is expressed or a loss is
incurred in a foreign money, the country issuing or adopting that money
substitutes a new money in place of that money, the obligation or the loss is treated
as if expressed or incurred in the new money at the rate of conversion the
issuing country establishes for the payment of like obligations or losses
denominated in the former money.

(b) If substitution under subsection (a)
occurs after a judgment or award is entered on a foreign-money claim, the court
or arbitrator, as the case may be, shall have jurisdiction to, and shall, amend
the judgment or award by a like conversion of the former money. [L 1990, c 50,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next